Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3596
Hospital authority; board of trustees; pecuniary interest in contract; prohibited; penalty.

No member of the board of trustees, or any person who shall have been a member of the board of trustees at any time during the immediately preceding period of two years, shall have any direct or indirect personal pecuniary interest in the purchase of any material to be used by or supplied to such authority, or in any contract with such authority. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor, and his office shall be vacated.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 21;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 88;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.94.